Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-108 Application for a solicitation
permit. To apply for a solicitation permit a person shall:

(1) File with the commissioner a request showing:

(A) Name, type and purpose of insurer or
corporation proposed to be formed;

(B) Names, addresses and business records of
each person associated or to be associated with in the formation of the
proposed insurer or corporation;

(C) Full disclosure of the terms of all
understandings and agreements existing or proposed among persons so associated
relative to the proposed insurer or corporation or the formation thereof;

(D) The plan according to which solicitations
are to be made;

(E) Such additional information as the
commissioner may reasonably require.

(2) File with the commissioner:

(A) (i) The articles of incorporation, or

(ii) The proposed subscribers' agreement and
power of attorney, if the proposed insurer is a reciprocal;

(B) Original and one copy of any proposed
bylaws;

(C) Copy of any security proposed to be issued
and copy of application or subscription agreement therefor;

(D) Copy of any insurance contract proposed to
be offered and copy of application therefor;

(E) Copy of any prospectus, advertising or
literature proposed to be used;

(F) Copy of proposed form of any escrow
agreement required.

(3) Deposit with the commissioner the appropriate
fees required by this code. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next